fr: Classe de capacité du bagage de moto: 0 à 5 L; 11 à 20 L; 21 à 30 L; 31 à 40 L; 41 à 60 L; 61 L et plus; 6 à 10 L; Autre
th: ระดับความจุสัมภาระของรถจักรยานยนต์: 0–5 ลิตร; 11–20 ลิตร; 21–30 ลิตร; 31–40 ลิตร; 41–60 ลิตร; 61+ ลิตร; 6–10 ลิตร; อื่นๆ
en: Motorcycle luggage capacity class: 0–5 L; 11–20 L; 21–30 L; 31–40 L; 41–60 L; 61+ L; 6–10 L; Other
sl-SI: Razred prostornine prtljage za motorna kolesa: 0–5 l; 11–20 l; 21–30 l; 31–40 l; 41–60 l; 61+ l; 6–10 l; Drugo
zh-TW: 機車行李容量等級: 0–5 公升; 11–20 公升; 21–30 公升; 31–40 公升; 41–60 公升; 61+ 公升; 6–10 公升; 其他
pt-BR: Bagagem de motocicleta classe de capacidade: 0–5 L; 11–20 L; 21–30 L; 31–40 L; 41–60 L; 61+ L; 6–10 L; Outros
ro-RO: Clasa de capacitate a bagajului pentru motocicletă: 0–5 L; 11–20 L; 21–30 L; 31–40 L; 41–60 L; 61+ L; 6–10 L; Altele
lt-LT: Motociklo bagažo talpos klasė: 0–5 l; 11–20 l; 21–30 l; 31–40 l; 41–60 l; 61+ l; 6–10 l; Kita
ja: オートバイの荷物積載量クラス: 0〜5L; 11〜20L; 21〜30L; 31〜40L; 41〜60L; 61L以上; 6〜10L; その他
pl: Klasa pojemności bagażu motocyklowego: 0–5 l; 11–20 l; 21–30 l; 31–40 l; 41–60 l; 61+ l; 6–10 l; Inne
es: Capacidad de equipaje para motocicleta: 0-5 L; 11-20 L; 21-30 L; 31-40 L; 41-60 L; 61+ L; 6-10 L; Otro
ru: Класс вместимости мотоциклетного багажа: 0–5 л; 11–20 л; 21–30 л; 31–40 л; 41–60 л; 61+ л; 6–10 л; Другое
nl: Motorfiets bagage inhoudsklasse: 0-5 l; 11-20 l; 21-30 l; 31-40 l; 41-60 l; 61+ l; 6-10 l; Overig
ko: 오토바이 수하물 적재 용량 등급: 0~5L; 11~20L; 21~30L; 31~40L; 41~60L; 61L 이상; 6~10L; 기타
fi: Moottoripyörän laukkujen kokoluokka: 0–5 l; 11–20 l; 21–30 l; 31–40 l; 41–60 l; Yli 61 l; 6–10 l; Muu
cs: Třída kapacity zavazadlového prostoru motocyklu: 0–5 l; 11–20 l; 21–30 l; 31–40 l; 41–60 l; 61 a více l; 6–10 l; Jiné
vi: Hạng dung tích hành lý xe mô tô: 0–5 L; 11–20 L; 21–30 L; 31–40 L; 41–60 L; 61+ L; 6–10 L; Khác
sk-SK: Trieda úložnej kapacity motocyklov: 0 – 5 l; 11 – 20 l; 21 – 30 l; 31 – 40 l; 41 – 60 l; 61 a viac l; 6 – 10 l; Iné
it: Classe di capacità del bagaglio da moto: 0-5 L; 11-20 L; 21-30 L; 31-40 L; 41-60 L; 61+ L; 6-10 L; Altro
tr: Motosiklet bagaj kapasitesi sınıfı: 0-5 L; 11-20 L; 21-30 L; 31-40 L; 41-60 L; 61+ L; 6-10 L; Diğer
nb: Størrelsesklasse for motorsykkelbagasje: 0–5 l; 11–20 l; 21–30 l; 31–40 l; 41–60 l; 61+ l; 6–10 l; Annet
de: Kapazitätsklasse des Motorradgepäcks: 0–5 l; 11–20 l; 21–30 l; 31–40 l; 41–60 l; 61+ l; 6–10 l; Sonstige
hr-HR: Klasa nosivosti prtljage motocikla: 0 – 5 L; 11 – 20 L; 21 – 30 L; 31 – 40 L; 41 – 60 L; 61+ L; 6 – 10 L; Ostalo
pt-PT: classe de capacidade de bagagem do motociclo: 0–5 L; 11–20 L; 21–30 L; 31–40 L; 41–60 L; 61+ L; 6–10 L; Outro
el: Κατηγορία χωρητικότητας αποσκευών μοτοσικλέτας: 0–5 L; 11–20 L; 21–30 L; 31–40 L; 41–60 L; 61+ L; 6–10 L; Άλλο
zh-CN: 摩托车行李容量等级: 0–5 升; 11–20 升; 21–30 升; 31–40 升; 41–60 升; 61 升以上; 6–10 升; 其他
sv: Kapacitetsklass för motorcykelbagage: 0–5 l; 11–20 l; 21–30 l; 31–40 l; 41–60 l; 61+ l; 6–10 l; Övrigt
hu: Motorkerékpár csomagtérkapacitási osztálya: 0–5 l; 11–20 l; 21–30 l; 31–40 l; 41–60 l; 61+ l; 6–10 l; Egyéb
da: Kapacitetsklasse for motorcykelbagage: 0–5 L; 11–20 L; 21–30 L; 31–40 L; 41–60 L; 61+ L; 6–10 L; Andet
bg-BG: Клас на капацитет на багажа на мотоциклет: 0 – 5 л; 11 – 20 л; 21 – 30 л; 31 – 40 л; 41 – 60 л; 61+ л; 6 – 10 л; Друго